Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-2003
City of the metropolitan class; eminent domain; when; procedure.

(1) Each city of the metropolitan class may exercise its power of eminent domain to maintain or preserve buildings, lands, areas, or districts which have been determined by the landmark heritage preservation commission created by such city to be of historical, architectural, cultural, or educational value.

(2) Within a landmark heritage preservation district, a city of the metropolitan class shall not exercise its power of eminent domain to acquire property for the purpose of demolition and reconveyance for private use. This subsection shall not be applicable to any eminent domain action filed by such city prior to September 6, 1991.

(3) Whenever it becomes necessary to take control of property pursuant to and for the purposes stated in this section, the purpose and necessity for such control shall be declared by ordinance. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1976, LB 711, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 247, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 324.
July 21, 2022